Hawaii statutes.
[§302A-703] Educational officers, salary
incentives. (a) The salary ranges for principal and vice-principal
positions shall be determined by the board, based on the position
classification/compensation plan approved by the board and salary incentives designed
to:

(1) Keep exemplary principals and vice-principals at
the school level;

(2) Encourage exemplary principals and
vice-principals to accept long-term assignments to hard-to-staff schools,
special needs schools, and schools with high teacher turnover;

(3) Encourage exemplary teachers to become
vice-principals;

(4) Encourage exemplary vice-principals to become
principals; and

(5) Encourage exemplary educational officers to
become vice-principals.

(b) The department shall develop a definition
of "exemplary" in consultation with the appropriate collective
bargaining representative.

Salary ranges and salary incentives for
educational officer positions shall be subject to the requirements of sections
302A-625 and 302A-626. [L 2001, c 256, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next